North Carolina, session 2025, HB569.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ABATEMENT OF PFAS EXCEEDANCES IN PUBLIC WATER SYSTEMS
SECTION 1. Article 1 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 130A-19.1. Abatement of PFAS exceedances.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Permissible concentration level. – For an individual per- and polyfluoroalkyl
substances (PFAS) compound, or combined PFAS compounds, any maximum
contaminant level that may be established by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency for the PFAS compound in question, or combined
compounds.
(2) PFAS manufacturer. – Persons that originally make PFAS compounds
through processes including, but not limited to, electrochemical fluorination
(ECF), telomerization, fluorocarbon polymerization, and production of
fluoropolymers. The term shall not include a person that uses previously made
PFAS material or items obtained from an original PFAS maker, for example:
(i) to produce commercial or consumer goods, such as weatherproof caulking,
or (ii) as intermediary products for use in the manufacture of commercial
goods, such as a greaseproof coating for a pizza box.
(3) Responsible party. – A PFAS manufacturer whose discharge or release of
PFAS into the environment has caused or contributed to the presence of PFAS
in a public water system as described in subsection (b) of this section.
(4) Secretary. – Means the Secretary of Environmental Quality.
(b) Pursuant to the Secretary's enforcement powers under G.S. 130A-19, authority to
adopt rules under G.S. 130A-315, and federally delegated duty to enforce the Federal Safe
Drinking Water Act in North Carolina, the Secretary may order a responsible party to pay a public
water system any actual and necessary costs incurred by the public water system to remove,
correct, or abate any adverse effects upon the water supply resulting from contamination for
which the person is responsible if the Secretary determines all of the following:
(1) The person is a PFAS manufacturer.
*H569-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The PFAS manufacturer discharged or released PFAS into the environment
that has caused or contributed to the presence of PFAS in the public water
system.
(3) The concentration of PFAS in the public water system, including any raw
water intake, regardless of the system's raw water source, including surface
water, public well, or pumped groundwater storage, has exceeded a
permissible concentration level.
Such costs shall include costs to procure, implement, maintain, and operate technology to
reduce PFAS concentrations in finished drinking water below the permissible concentration
level. If a responsible party refuses to comply with an order, the Secretary may institute an action
in the superior court of the county where the public water system exists to enforce the order.
(c) A responsible party shall be jointly and severally liable for all actual and necessary
costs imposed by the Secretary pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. Nothing in this section
shall limit or diminish any rights of contribution for costs incurred herein.
(d) A public water system shall reimburse ratepayers of the system through a reduction
in future rates charged if (i) the public water system has previously expended funds to remove,
correct, or abate any adverse effects upon its water supply resulting from PFAS contamination,
(ii) the amount of funds expended by the public water system for that purpose has been included
in rates charged to its ratepayers, and (iii) the funds expended by the public water system are
subsequently reimbursed by the responsible party as the result of an order issued pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
(e) The remedy under this section is in addition to those provided by existing statutory
and common law."

PART II. IMPLEMENTATION FUNDING
SECTION 2.(a) Department Funding. – The sum of three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Environmental Quality (Department) to implement the requirements
of this act. These funds shall be deposited into the PFAS Public Water Protection Fund, which is
established in the Department as a special fund. The Department may establish time-limited
positions with the funds appropriated by this subsection.
SECTION 2.(b) Report. – The Department shall report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources no later than
December 15, 2025, and annually thereafter, on their use of the funds appropriated by this act,
including abatement orders issued by the Secretary of Environmental Quality using the authority
conferred by G.S. 130A-19.1, as enacted by Section 1 of this act.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act becomes effective September 1, 2025. Section 1
of this act is effective when it becomes law and applies retroactively to costs incurred by a public
water system on or after January 1, 2017, to remove, correct, or abate any adverse effects upon a
water supply resulting from contamination, irrespective of when a maximum contaminant level
was established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for the PFAS compound
in question. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 569-First Edition